California, session 20252026, AB691.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17052.27 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17052.27. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2030, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” as that term is defined in Section 17039, an amount equal to the following:(1) The qualified pet adoption costs paid or incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(2) The qualified pet medical expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).(b) For purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Qualified animal rescue organization” means a public animal control agency or shelter, humane society shelter, or nonprofit rescue group that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is domiciled in this state and primarily engaged in rescuing and placing animals in permanent homes.(2) “Qualified pet” means a dog, cat, or other companion animal adopted from a qualified animal rescue organization that is not used by the taxpayer in a trade or business or for the production of income.(3) “Qualified pet adoption costs” means the costs paid to a qualified animal rescue organization as adoption fees to secure the adoption of qualified pet.(4) “Qualified pet medical expenses” means unreimbursed amounts paid for veterinary care, including vaccinations, spaying or neutering, and other necessary medical treatments for a qualified pet in the first 12 months following adoption.(c) (1) (A) The credit allowed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be claimed more than once during the life of the taxpayer.(B) The credit allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall not be claimed with regard to qualified pet medical expenses for more than one qualified pet during the life of the taxpayer, and shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) cumulatively for that qualified pet.(2) In the case of spouses filing a joint return, the limitations described in paragraph (1) shall apply to each spouse separately.(d) The taxpayer shall provide, upon request and in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, all documentation that the Franchise Tax Board determines necessary to administer this section, including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Receipt or certification from the qualified animal rescue organization specifying the adoption date, pet description, and adoption fee paid.(2) Receipts or invoices from a licensed veterinarian detailing the expenses incurred within the first 12 months following adoption.(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury that the taxpayer has not previously claimed the respective credit under this section in any prior taxable year, except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).(e) (1) For purposes complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares the following:(A) The specific purpose of the credit authorized by this section is to encourage the adoption of pets from rescue organizations.(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the credit achieves its stated goal are the number of taxpayers allowed a credit and the total dollar value of credits allowed.(2) (A) On or before December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers allowed a credit pursuant to this section and the total dollar value of credits allowed.(B) The disclosure requirements of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(f) This section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.SECTION 1.Section 3353 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:3353.Publication shall be made pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in the county. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the county, then the publication shall be made by posting in three public places in the county. The cost of publication shall be not more than the rate fixed by the board of supervisors for other county advertising.